North Carolina, session 2025, SB1000.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143B-283(b4) reads as rewritten:
"(b4) Commission Staff, Structure, and Function. –
(1) The chair is authorized and empowered to employ professional,
administrative, technical, and clerical personnel as the chair may determine to
be necessary in the proper discharge of the Commission's duty and
responsibility as provided by law. The chair shall organize and direct the work
of the Commission staff. staff and may use the Temporary Solutions Program
administered by the Office of State Human Resources at the chair's discretion
to acquire new temporary employees. Any additional clerical and other
services required by the Commission shall be supplied by the Secretary of the
Department at the direction of the chair.
(2) The salaries and compensation of all such personnel shall be fixed in the
manner provided by law for fixing and regulating salaries and compensation
by other State agencies.
(3) The chair, within allowed budgetary limits and as allowed by law, shall
authorize and approve travel, subsistence, and related expenses of such
personnel incurred while traveling on official business."
SECTION 2. The General Fund appropriation to the Department of Environmental
Quality for the purpose of providing dedicated staff for the Environmental Management
Commission is reduced on a recurring basis by five thousand dollars ($5,000).
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S1000-v-1*